Tennessee, session 114, SB0608.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 55-18-104, is amended by adding
the following sentence at the end of the section:
The commissioner may promulgate rules as are necessary or proper to carry out this
chapter.
SECTION 2. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
SB0608
001780
- 1 -